Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/an_ES.dic
fendo/CDEH
feito/BEH
foi/EH
fas/EH
fa/EH
fe/CDEH
femos/EH
fan/EH
feba/EH
febas/EH
febanos/EH
febatz/EH
feban/EH
facié/EH
fació/EH
faciemos/EH
facietz/EH
facioron/EH
fice/EH
fices/EH
fizo/EH
ficietz/EH
ficioron/EH
faré/EH
feré/EH
farás/EH
ferá/EH
fará/EH
faremos/EH
feretz/EH
faretz/EH
ferán/EH
faran/EH
fería/EH
ferías/EH
feríatz/EH
ferían/EH
fese/EH
feses/EH
fesenos/EH
fesetz/EH
fesen/EH
faigas/EH
faigamos/EH
faigatz/EH
faigan/EH
